Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.220

Residential care contracted services, conversion to—Requirements.

For the purpose of encouraging a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW to convert a portion or all of its licensed bed capacity to provide enhanced adult residential care contracted services under chapter 74.39A RCW, the department shall:

(1) Find the nursing home to be in satisfactory compliance with RCW 18.20.110 and 18.20.130, upon application for assisted living facility licensure and the production of copies of its most recent nursing home inspection reports demonstrating compliance with the safety standards and fire regulations, as required by RCW 18.51.140, and the state building code, as required by RCW 18.51.145, including any waivers that may have been granted. However, assisted living facility licensure requirements pertaining to resident to bathing fixture/toilet ratio, corridor call system, resident room door closures, and resident room windows may require modification, unless determined to be functionally equivalent, based upon a prelicensure survey inspection.

(2) Allow residents receiving enhanced adult residential care services to make arrangements for on-site health care services, consistent with Title 18 RCW regulating health care professions, to the extent that such services can be provided while maintaining the resident's right to privacy and safety in treatment, but this in no way means that such services may only be provided in a private room. The provision of on-site health care services must otherwise be consistent with RCW 18.20.160 and the rules adopted under RCW 18.20.160.

[ 2012 c 10 s 14; 1997 c 164 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.